Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-919
Margins along tracks; keep free from debris and vegetation; enforcement.

Each railroad in this state shall keep and maintain the margins alongside its tracks where railroad employees are required to walk in the course of their duties reasonably free from debris and vegetation which affect the safety of such employees while working. The Public Service Commission shall enforce and prosecute any violation of this section.

Laws 1973, LB 177, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 24.